Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.100

Annual report—Contents.

The director of financial institutions shall file in his or her office all reports required to be made to the director, prepare and furnish to banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, and trust companies and departments blank forms for such reports as are required of them, and, beginning in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and each biennium thereafter, make a report to the governor showing:

(1) A summary of the conditions of the banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, and trust companies and departments at the date of their last report; and

(2) A list of those organized or closed during the year.

The director may publish such other statements, reports, and pamphlets as he or she deems advisable.

[ 2009 c 518 s 11; 1993 c 472 s 24; 1977 c 75 s 43; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.090. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 13; RRS s 3220. Formerly RCW 43.19.090.]